Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4164.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 203a. As used in section 203: (a) "Active duty combat" means participating in or performing any of the following active services in the service of the United States: (i) An armed conflict. (ii) A hazardous service relating to an armed conflict in a foreign country. (iii) A duty through an instrumentality of war. (b) "Official declaration of war" means an official declaration of war made by the United States Congress under clause 11 of section 8 of article I of the Constitution of the United States. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. ____ (request no. H00559'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.